New York, session 2025-2026, A3365.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subsection (b) of section 3224-b of the 2 insurance law, as amended by chapter 237 of the laws of 2009, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (3) A health plan shall not initiate overpayment recovery efforts more 5 than [twenty-four] twelve months after the original payment was received 6 by a health care provider. However, no such time limit shall apply to 7 overpayment recovery efforts that are: (i) based on a reasonable belief 8 of fraud or other intentional misconduct, or abusive billing, (ii) 9 required by, or initiated at the request of, a self-insured plan, or 10 (iii) required or authorized by a state or federal government program or 11 coverage that is provided by this state or a municipality thereof to its 12 respective employees, retirees or members. Notwithstanding the aforemen- 13 tioned time limitations, in the event that a health care provider 14 asserts that a health plan has underpaid a claim or claims, the health 15 plan may defend or set off such assertion of underpayment based on over- 16 payments going back in time as far as the claimed underpayment. For 17 purposes of this paragraph, "abusive billing" shall be defined as a 18 billing practice which results in the submission of claims that are not 19 consistent with sound fiscal, business, or medical practices and at such 20 frequency and for such a period of time as to reflect a consistent 21 course of conduct. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06060-02-5